Washington statutes.
RCW 36.56.090

Rules and regulations, pending business, contracts, obligations, validity of official acts.

All rules and regulations, and all pending business before the committees, divisions, boards, and other agencies of any metropolitan municipal corporation transferred pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall be continued and acted upon by the county.

All existing contracts and obligations of the transferred metropolitan municipal corporation shall remain in full force and effect, and shall be performed by the county. No transfer authorized in this chapter shall affect the validity of any official act performed by any official or employee prior to the transfer authorized pursuant to *this amendatory act.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 277 s 9.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: "this amendatory act," see note following RCW 36.56.010.